California, session 20252026, AB2224.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) County recorders serve as the official archivist for vital and official records, including real property documents, maps, and other essential filings. These records provide constructive notice as required by statute to protect California’s legal, financial, housing systems, and property ownership. Records of birth, death, or marriage events are necessary to obtain medical, financial, or survivor benefits and are necessary to meet federal security standards. The integrity, accessibility, and timely processing of these records are essential to the public, the state’s real estate industry, and financial institutions.(2) County recorders maintain daily operations to provide the public with consistent access to official records and strive to provide a seamless recording for California home buyers and the general public, while meeting recording statutory requirements.(3) The county recorder is a fee-for-service department where fees charged are intended to cover the cost of services provided to the public.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to adjust recording fees to increase transparency for the public and to ensure the effective delivery of government services by requiring all of the following:(1) Electronic recording throughout California for all documents.(2) The elimination of fees no longer necessary due to technological advances.(3) The standardization of the fee structure to promote greater clarity to the public, expedite the recording process, and decrease the frequency of recording rejections.(4)A four-month implementation window prior to eliminating and adjusting the fee to allow adequate time for the public notice and real estate industry preparation.SEC. 2. Section 6103.8 of the Government Code is amended to read:6103.8. (a) Sections 6103 and 27383 do not apply to any fee or charge for recording full releases executed or recorded pursuant to Section 7174 of the Government Code, Sections 4608 and 5003.7 of the Public Resources Code, and Sections 2194, 11496, 12494, and 32362 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, where there is full satisfaction of the amount due under the lien that is released.(b) The fee for recording full releases listed in subdivision (a) shall be the amount prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 27361.3.(c) In the case of full releases recorded by the state taxing agency pursuant to Section 7174 of the Government Code, the recording agency shall be billed quarterly or, at the option of the agency, at more frequent intervals. All billing shall refer to the agency certificate number of the recorded releases.(d) The fee for recording full releases for any document relating to an agreement to reimburse a county for public aid granted by the county shall be the amount prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 27361.3.(e) The fee for filing any release of judgment that was in favor of a government agency and recorded pursuant to Section 6103 or 27383 shall be the amount prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 27361.3.(f) Sections 6103 and 27383 do not apply to any fee or charge for recording a notice of state tax lien under subdivision (d) of Section 7171 or a certificate of release under subdivision (h) of Section 7174.(g) The fee for recording a notice of state tax lien pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 7171 and a certificate of release under subdivision (h) of Section 7174 shall be as permitted by Sections 27361 and 27361.4.(h) In the case of recording a notice of state tax lien pursuant to subdivision (f) or a certificate of release pursuant to subdivision (f), the recording agency shall be billed quarterly or at the option of the agency at more frequent intervals. All billing shall refer to the agency notice or certificate number.SEC. 3. Section 7171 of the Government Code is amended to read:7171. (a) With respect to real property, at any time after creation of a state tax lien, the agency may record in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the real property is located a notice of state tax lien.(b) With respect to personal property, at any time after creation of a state tax lien, the agency may file a notice of state tax lien with the Secretary of State pursuant to Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220).(c) (1) The notice of state tax lien recorded or filed pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall include all of the following:(A) The name and last known address of the taxpayer.(B) The name of the agency giving notice of the lien.(C) The amount of the unpaid tax.(D) A statement that the amount of the unpaid tax is a lien on all real or personal property and rights to that property, including all after-acquired property and rights to property, belonging to the taxpayer.(E) A statement that the agency has complied with all of the provisions of the applicable law for determining and assessing the tax.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 27390, the transmission, filing, recording, and indexing of notices of state tax liens recorded or filed pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), and all documents that relate to or affect those liens, including, but not limited to, a release, an extension, or a subordination, by electronic or magnetic means using computerized data processing, telecommunications, or the other similar information technologies available to the filing offices shall be permitted. A facsimile signature that complies with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 27201 shall be accepted on any document relating to a state tax lien filed or recorded pursuant to this paragraph.(d) If the notice of state tax lien recorded in any county reflects an out-of-state address as the last known address of the taxpayer, the agency shall pay the fees required by Sections 27361 and 27361.4.(e) The agency recording a notice of state tax lien pursuant to subdivision (d) may collect from the taxpayer, in any manner provided by law for the collection of the tax, the cost of recording.SEC. 4. Section 7174 of the Government Code is amended to read:7174. (a) If the agency determines that the amount of tax, interest, and any penalty are sufficiently secured by a lien on other property or that the release or subordination of the state tax lien will not jeopardize the collection of the amount of the tax, including interest and penalty, the agency may at any time release all or any portion of the property subject to the state tax lien from the lien or may subordinate the state tax lien to other liens and encumbrances.(b) If the agency finds that the liability represented by the state tax lien, including any interest accrued thereon, is legally unenforceable, the agency may release the lien.(c) If the agency has recorded a notice of state tax lien as provided in Section 7171 and the liability represented by the lien, including any interest and penalty, has been satisfied in full:(1) If the agency is other than the Controller or the State Board of Equalization, the agency shall, not later than 40 days after the liability is satisfied, record a certificate of release in the office of the county recorder where the notice of state tax lien is recorded.(2) In the case of the Controller or the State Board of Equalization, the agency shall, not later than 40 days after the liability is satisfied, do one of the following:(A) Record a certificate of release in the office of the county recorder where the notice of state tax lien is recorded.(B) Deposit in the mail or otherwise deliver to the taxpayer a certificate of release.(d) If the agency records a certificate of release under subdivision (c) or files a certificate of release under subdivision (e), the cost of recording or filing is an obligation of the taxpayer and may be collected from the taxpayer in any manner provided by law for the collection of the tax.(e) If the agency has filed a notice of state tax lien with the Secretary of State as provided in Section 7171 and the liability represented by the state tax lien, including any interest and penalty, has been satisfied in full, the agency shall, not later than 40 days after the liability is satisfied, do one of the following:(1) File a certificate of release with the Secretary of State.(2) Deposit in the mail or otherwise deliver a certificate of release to the taxpayer.(f) For the purpose of subdivisions (c) and (e), if payment is made by check, the 40-day period does not commence to run until the check has been paid by the financial institution upon which it was drawn.(g) A certificate by the agency to the effect that any property has been released from a state tax lien or that the lien has been subordinated to other liens and encumbrances is conclusive evidence that the property has been released or that the lien has been subordinated as provided in the certificate.(h) If the certificate of release recorded pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) reflects an out-of-state address as the last known address of the taxpayer, the agency shall pay the fees permitted by Sections 27361 and 27361.4.SEC. 5. Section 27201 of the Government Code is amended to read:27201. (a) (1) (A) The recorder shall, upon payment of proper fees and taxes, accept for recordation any instrument, paper, or notice that is authorized or required by statute, or court order to be recorded, or authorized or required to be recorded by a local ordinance that relates to the recordation of any instrument, paper, or notice that relates to real property, if the instrument, paper, or notice contains sufficient information to be indexed as provided by statute, meets recording requirements of state statutes and local ordinances, and is photographically reproducible. The county recorder shall not refuse to record any instrument, paper, or notice that is authorized or required by statute, court order, or local ordinance that relates to the recordation of any instrument, paper, or notice that relates to real property to be recorded on the basis of its lack of legal sufficiency.(B) “Photographically reproducible,” for purposes of this division, means all instruments, papers, or notices that comply with standards as recommended by the American National Standards Institute or the Association for Information and Image Management for recording of records.(2) (A) A person of or related to the record may request that the recorder correct the information contained in an index of a record. The request shall identify the exact location of an error within a specifically identified index entry.(B) If the person making the request provides sufficient evidence to the recorder to determine that there is an error in the index that needs to be corrected, the recorder shall correct that index entry within 30 business days of receiving the request.(C) The corrected index entry shall be entered into the public index to reflect both the error and the correction. The recorder shall note that an index entry has been corrected in accordance with local policy.(b) (1) Each instrument, paper, or notice shall contain an original signature or signatures, except as otherwise provided by law, or be a certified copy of the original.(2) A facsimile signature shall be accepted on a lien recorded by a governmental agency when that facsimile signature has been officially adopted by that agency. The lien shall have noted on its face a statement to that effect. The officially adopted facsimile signature shall be provided to the county recorder by a letter from the agency. A facsimile signature shall continue to be valid until the agency notifies the county recorder that the facsimile signature has been revoked.(c) (1) Each instrument, paper, or notice that is rerecorded shall be executed and acknowledged or verified as a new document, in addition to any previous execution and acknowledgment or verification, unless any of the following apply:(A) The instrument, paper, or notice is otherwise exempted by Section 27287 or any other law.(B) The instrument, paper, or notice is presented solely to correct a recording sequence. The intent of the parties with regard to the priority of recorded documents shall be controlling regardless of the sequence of recording by a county recorder or the sequence of recording specified in instructions given by a submitter to a county recorder. This subparagraph is declaratory of existing law, and any rerecording of documents to change the sequential numbers assigned to a document by the recorder shall not require the document to be executed and acknowledged or verified as a new document.(C) (i) The instrument, paper, or notice is presented solely to make a minor correction with a corrective affidavit. The corrective affidavit shall satisfy all of the following:(I) Be attached to the original recorded instrument, paper, or notice.(II) Set out the information corrected.(III) Be certified by the party submitting the affidavit under penalty of perjury.(IV) Be acknowledged pursuant to Section 27287.(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “minor correction” includes any of the following:(I) An incorrect or missing address of the party to which the instrument, paper, or notice is to be returned following recording pursuant to Section 27361.6.(II) A clarification of illegible text pursuant to Section 27361.7.(III) An incorrect or missing printed or typed name of an individual or entity near the signature pursuant to Section 27280.5.(IV) An incorrect or missing documentary transfer tax amount due pursuant to Section 11932 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(2) Each rerecorded instrument, paper, or notice shall include a cover sheet that complies with Section 27361.6 and shall state the reason for rerecording on the cover sheet.(d) The recorder shall provide access to a true copy of the public record for each instrument, paper, or notice, recorded in the office of the recorder, to facilitate public inspection.SEC. 6. Section 27361 of the Government Code is amended to read:27361. (a) (1) The fee for recording and indexing every instrument, paper, or notice required or permitted by law to be recorded shall be fifteen dollars ($15) for recording the first page and four dollars ($4) for each additional page, to reimburse the county for the costs of services rendered pursuant to this subdivision.(2) The county recorder collecting the fee pursuant to paragraph (1) shall implement an electronic recording delivery system, pursuant to the Electronic Recording Delivery Act of 2004 (Article 6 (commencing with Section 27390) of Chapter 6 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 3), on or before January 1, 2028.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the fees imposed by paragraph (1) shall not exceed the reasonable costs of the county recorder’s office for providing these services.(b) Notwithstanding Section 68085, one dollar ($1) for recording the first page and one dollar ($1) for each additional page shall be restricted and available solely to support, maintain, improve, and provide for the full operation for modernized creation, retention, and retrieval of information in each county’s system of recorded documents.(c) (1) In addition to all other fees authorized by this section, a county recorder may charge a fee of one dollar ($1) for recording the first page of every instrument, paper, or notice required or permitted by law to be recorded, as authorized by each county’s board of supervisors. The funds generated by this fee shall be restricted and used only by the county recorder collecting the fee for the purpose of implementing a social security number truncation program pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 27300).(2) A county recorder shall not charge the fee described in paragraph (1) after December 31, 2017, unless the county recorder has received reauthorization by the county’s board of supervisors. A county recorder shall not seek reauthorization of the fee by the board before June 1, 2017, or after December 31, 2017. In determining the additional period of authorization, the board shall consider the review described in paragraph (4).(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a county recorder who, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 27304, secures a revenue anticipation loan, or other outside source of funding, for the implementation of a social security number truncation program, may be authorized to charge the fee described in paragraph (1) for a period not to exceed the term of repayment of the loan or other outside source of funding.(4) A county board of supervisors that authorizes the fee described in this subdivision shall require the county auditor to conduct two reviews to verify that the funds generated by this fee are used only for the purpose of the program, as described in Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 27300) and for conducting these reviews. The reviews shall state the progress of the county recorder in truncating recorded documents pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 27301, and shall estimate any ongoing costs to the county recorder of complying with subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 27301. The board shall require that the first review be completed not before June 1, 2012, or after December 31, 2013, and that the second review be completed not before June 1, 2017, or after December 31, 2017. The reviews shall adhere to generally accepted accounting standards, and the review results shall be made available to the public.(d) Except as provided in subdivision (g) of Section 6103.8, the fee authorized by this section shall not be charged to those entities exempted from the payment of recording fees under Section 6103 or 27383.(e) Unless otherwise specified, all fees collected pursuant to this section shall be restricted, dedicated to, and solely utilized for, the recorder’s office.SEC. 7. Section 27361.2 of the Government Code is repealed.SEC. 8. Section 27361.3 of the Government Code is amended to read:27361.3. (a) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of the law, the fee for recording every release of lien, encumbrance, or notice executed by the state, or any municipality, county, city, district, or other political subdivision shall be two times the fee charged to record the first page of a lien, encumbrance, or notice under subdivision (a) of Section 27361, on January 1 of the year the release is recorded if the original lien, encumbrance, or notice was recorded without fee as provided by Section 27383.(b) No fee shall be charged for recording a release of lien, encumbrance, or notice which was recorded in error by the state, or any municipality, county, city, district, or other political subdivision if there is noted on the face of the release of lien, encumbrance, or notice a statement to that effect.(c) Two dollars ($2) for recording each release of lien pursuant to this section shall be restricted and available solely to support, maintain, improve, and provide for the full operation for modernized creation, retention, and retrieval of information in each county’s system of recorded documents.SEC. 9. Section 27361.8 of the Government Code is repealed.SEC. 10. Section 27388.2 of the Government Code is amended to read:27388.2. (a) In addition to all other fees authorized by this section, a county recorder may charge a fee of two dollars ($2) for recording the first page of every real estate instrument, paper, or notice required or permitted by law to be recorded per each single transaction per parcel of real property, except those expressly exempted from payment of recording fees, as authorized by each county’s board of supervisors and in accordance with applicable constitutional requirements. The funds generated by this fee shall be restricted and used only by the county recorder collecting the fee for the purpose of implementing a restrictive covenant program pursuant to Section 12956.3. “Real estate instrument, paper, or notice” means a document relating to real property, including, but not limited to, the following: deed, grant deed, trustee’s deed, deed of trust, reconveyance, quit claim deed, fictitious deed of trust, assignment of deed of trust, request for notice of default, abstract of judgment, subordination agreement, declaration of homestead, abandonment of homestead, notice of default, release or discharge, easement, notice of trustee sale, notice of completion, UCC financing statement, mechanic’s lien, maps, and covenants, conditions, and restrictions.(b) The fee described in subdivision (a) shall not be imposed on any of the following documents:(1) Any real estate instrument, paper, or notice recorded in connection with a transfer subject to the imposition of a documentary transfer tax, as defined in Section 11911 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(2) Any real estate instrument, paper, or notice recorded in connection with a transfer of real property that is a residential dwelling to an owner-occupier.(3) Any real estate instrument, paper, or notice executed or recorded by the federal government in accordance with the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act (Title 7 (commencing with Section 2100) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure).(4) Any real estate instrument, paper, or notice executed or recorded by the state or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state.(c) A county recorder shall not charge the fee described in this section after December 31, 2027, unless the county recorder has received reauthorization by the county’s board of supervisors. A county recorder shall not seek reauthorization of the fee by the board before June 1, 2027, or after December 31, 2027. Any reauthorization period shall not exceed five years.SEC. 11. Section 27391 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 3 of Chapter 380 of the Statutes of 2016, is amended to read:27391. (a) Upon approval by resolution of the board of supervisors and system certification by the Attorney General, a county recorder may establish an electronic recording delivery system.(b) Upon system certification, a county recorder may enter into a contract with a title insurer as defined in Section 12340.4 of the Insurance Code, underwritten title company as defined in Section 12340.5 of the Insurance Code, institutional lender as defined in paragraph (1), (2), or (4) of subdivision (j) of Section 50003 of the Financial Code, or an entity of local, state, or federal government for the delivery for recording, and return to the party requesting recording, of a digital or digitized electronic record that is an instrument to be recorded consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 27201. The contract may provide for the delivery of documents by an agent. However, the agent shall not be a vendor of electronic recording delivery systems.(c) (1) A county recorder may enter into a contract with an authorized submitter not authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) for the delivery for recording, and return to the party requesting recording, of a digital or digitized electronic record that is an instrument to be recorded consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 27201. The contract may provide for the delivery of documents by an agent. However, the agent shall not be a vendor of electronic recording delivery systems.(2) An authorized submitter authorized pursuant to this subdivision and any agent submitting documents on behalf of an authorized submitter pursuant to this subdivision shall provide proof of financial responsibility by providing a certificate of insurance evidencing an amount of general liability coverage reasonably adequate to protect against liability and cover potential losses. The amount of general liability coverage required by this paragraph shall be set through rule or regulation by the Attorney General in consultation with interested parties.(d) A county recorder may refuse to enter into a contract with any party or may terminate or suspend access to a system for any good faith reason, including, but not limited to, a determination by the county recorder that termination or suspension is necessary to protect the public interest, to protect the integrity of public records, or to protect homeowners from financial harm, or if the volume or quality of instruments submitted by the requester is not sufficient to warrant electronic recordation. A county recorder may also terminate or suspend access to a system if a party commits a substantive breach of the contract, the requirements of this article, or the regulations adopted pursuant to this article.(e) Notwithstanding Section 27321, a county recorder may require a party electronically submitting records to mail a copy of the recorded electronic document to the address specified in the instructions for mailing upon completion of recording.(f) When a signature is required to be accompanied by a notary’s seal or stamp, that requirement is satisfied if the electronic signature of the notary contains all of the following:(1) The name of the notary.(2) The words “Notary Public.”(3) The name of the county where the bond and oath of office of the notary are filed.(4) The sequential identification number assigned to the notary, if any.(5) The sequential identification number assigned to the manufacturer or vendor of the notary’s physical or electronic seal, if any.SEC. 12. Section 27391 of the Government Code, as added by Section 4 of Chapter 380 of the Statutes of 2016, is repealed.SEC. 13. Section 27393 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 5 of Chapter 380 of the Statutes of 2016, is amended to read:27393. (a) The Attorney General shall, in consultation with interested parties, adopt regulations for the review, approval, and oversight of electronic recording delivery systems. Regulations shall be adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3). The regulations shall comply with Section 12168.7.(b) The regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) may include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Establishment of baseline technological and procedural specifications for electronic recording delivery systems.(2) Requirements for security, capacity, reliability, and uniformity.(3) Requirements as to the nature and frequency of computer security audits.(4) A statement of a detailed and uniform definition of the term “source code” consistent with paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 27390, and as used in this article, and applicable to each county’s electronic recording delivery system.(5) Requirements for placement of a copy of the operating system, source code, compilers, and all related software associated with each county’s electronic recording delivery system in an approved escrow facility prior to that system’s first use.(6) Requirements to ensure that substantive modifications to an operating system, compilers, related software, or source code are approved by the Attorney General.(7) Procedures for initial certification of vendors offering software and other services to counties for electronic recording delivery systems.(8) Requirements for system certification and for oversight of approved systems.(9) Requirements for general liability coverage required by subdivision (c) of Section 27391.(10) Requirements for fingerprinting and criminal records checks required by Section 27395, including a list of employment positions or classifications subject to criminal records checks under subdivision (f) of that section.(11) Requirements for uniform index information that shall be included in every digitized or digital electronic record.(12) Requirements for protecting proprietary information accessed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 27394 from public disclosure.(13) Requirements for certification under Section 27397.5.(c) The Attorney General may promulgate any other regulations necessary to fulfill their obligations under this article.(d) An electronic recording delivery system shall be subject to local inspection and review by the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall furnish a statement of any relevant findings associated with a local inspection of an electronic recording delivery system, to the county recorder and the district attorney of the affected county, and to all technology vendors associated with that system.SEC. 14. Section 27393 of the Government Code, as added by Section 6 of Chapter 380 of the Statutes of 2016, is repealed.SEC. 15. Section 27397.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:27397.5. (a) A county recorder may include in the county’s electronic recording delivery system a secure method for accepting for recording a digital or digitized electronic record, including, but not limited to, an instrument of reconveyance, substitution of trustee, or assignment of deed of trust.(b) A county recorder may contract with a title insurer, as defined in Section 12340.4 of the Insurance Code, underwritten title company, as defined in Section 12340.5 of the Insurance Code, an entity of state, local, or federal government, or an institutional lender, as defined in Section 50003 of the Financial Code, or their authorized agents, to be an authorized submitter of the documents specified in subdivision (a).(c) With respect to the electronic submission of the records described in subdivision (a), the requirements that an authorized submitter be subject to a security audit under Section 27394 and a criminal records check under Section 27395 shall not apply where the certification requirements of subdivision (d) have been met.(d) (1) In order for subdivision (c) to apply, the county recorder and the Attorney General shall certify that the method of submission allowed under the system will not permit an authorized submitter or its employees and agents, or any third party, to modify, manipulate, insert, or delete information in the public record, maintained by the county recorder, or information in electronic records submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27391.(2) Certification under this section may be withdrawn by either the county recorder or the Attorney General at any time either determines that the requirements of this subdivision are not met.(e) For purposes of this section, an agent of an authorized submitter shall not include a vendor of electronic recording delivery systems.SEC. 16. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.